District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-2602.02

Applicability of District insurance laws.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 4, 1922, 42 Stat. 402, ch. 93, title II, § 2
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(q), 44 DCR 1730
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 401(b), 50 DCR 330

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1402.
1973 Ed., § 35-1102.

Editor's Notes

Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-2602.01.